Hawaii statutes.
§602-55 Panels; substitute judge.
Parties shall be entitled to a hearing before a panel of not less than three
intermediate appellate judges. In the event the number of available
intermediate appellate judges is insufficient to make up a panel because of
vacancy or disqualification, the chief justice of the supreme court may
designate circuit judges or retired intermediate appellate judges or retired
supreme court justices to temporarily fill such need. A judge serving
temporarily shall not be actively engaged in the practice of law. Substitute
judges shall be compensated per diem at a rate of pay equivalent to that of
associate intermediate appellate judges. [L 1979, c 111, pt of §3; am L 1983, c
244, §1; am L 2006, c 4, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next